Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.365

Off-road vehicle.

"Off-road vehicle" or "ORV" means a nonstreet registered vehicle when used for recreational purposes on nonhighway roads, trails, or a variety of other natural terrain. "Off-road vehicle" or "ORV" includes, but is not limited to, all-terrain vehicles, motorcycles, four-wheel drive vehicles, and dune buggies.

[ 2010 c 161 s 127.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.